Missouri, session 2026, SB1708.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 208.146, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 208.146,
to read as follows:
208.146. 1. The program established under this
section shall be known as the "Ticket to Work Health
Assurance Program". Subject to appropriations and in
accordance with the federal Ticket to Work and Work
Incentives Improvement Act of 1999 (TWWIIA), Public Law 106-
170, the medical assistance provided for in section 208.151
may be paid for a person who is employed and who:
(1) Except for earnings, meets the definition of
disabled under the Supplemental Security Income Program or
meets the definition of an employed individual with a
medically improved disability under TWWIIA;
(2) Has earned income, as defined in subsection 2 of
this section;
(3) Meets the asset limits in subsection 3 of this
section; and
(4) Has income, as determined in subsection 3 of this
section, that does not exceed two hundred fifty percent of
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1708 2
the federal poverty level, excluding any earned income of
the worker with a disability between two hundred fifty and
three hundred percent of the federal poverty level.
2. For income to be considered earned income for
purposes of this section, the department of social services
shall document that Medicare and Social Security taxes are
withheld from such income. Self-employed persons shall
provide proof of payment of Medicare and Social Security
taxes for income to be considered earned.
3. (1) For purposes of determining eligibility under
this section, the available asset limit and the definition
of available assets shall be the same as those used to
determine MO HealthNet eligibility for permanent and totally
disabled individuals under subdivision (24) of subsection 1
of section 208.151 except for:
(a) Medical savings accounts limited to deposits of
earned income and earnings on such income while a
participant in the program created under this section with a
value not to exceed five thousand dollars per year;
(b) Independent living accounts limited to deposits of
earned income and earnings on such income while a
participant in the program created under this section with a
value not to exceed five thousand dollars per year. For
purposes of this section, an "independent living account"
means an account established and maintained to provide
savings for transportation, housing, home modification, and
personal care services and assistive devices associated with
such person's disability; and
(c) Retirement accounts including, but not limited to,
individual accounts, 401(k) plans, 403(b) plans, Keogh
plans, and pension plans, provided that income from such

SB 1708 3
accounts be calculated as income under subdivision (4) of
subsection 1 of this section.
(2) To determine income, the following shall be
disregarded:
(a) The first fifty thousand dollars of earned income
of the person's spouse;
(b) A twenty dollar standard deduction;
(c) Health insurance premiums;
(d) A seventy-five dollar a month standard deduction
for the disabled worker's dental and optical insurance when
the total dental and optical insurance premiums are less
than seventy-five dollars;
(e) All Supplemental Security Income payments, and the
first fifty dollars of SSDI payments; and
(f) A standard deduction for impairment-related
employment expenses equal to one-half of the disabled
worker's earned income.
4. Any person whose income exceeds one hundred percent
of the federal poverty level shall pay a premium for
participation in the medical assistance provided in this
section. Such premium shall be:
(1) For a person whose income is more than one hundred
percent but less than one hundred fifty percent of the
federal poverty level, four percent of income at one hundred
percent of the federal poverty level;
(2) For a person whose income equals or exceeds one
hundred fifty percent but is less than two hundred percent
of the federal poverty level, four percent of income at one
hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty level;
(3) For a person whose income equals or exceeds two
hundred percent but less than two hundred fifty percent of

SB 1708 4
the federal poverty level, five percent of income at two
hundred percent of the federal poverty level;
(4) For a person whose income equals or exceeds two
hundred fifty percent up to and including three hundred
percent of the federal poverty level, six percent of income
at two hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty level.
5. Recipients of services through this program shall
report any change in income or household size within ten
days of the occurrence of such change. An increase in
premiums resulting from a reported change in income or
household size shall be effective with the next premium
invoice that is mailed to a person after due process
requirements have been met. A decrease in premiums shall be
effective the first day of the month immediately following
the month in which the change is reported.
6. If an eligible person's employer offers employer-
sponsored health insurance and the department of social
services determines that it is more cost effective, such
person shall participate in the employer-sponsored
insurance. The department shall pay such person's portion
100 of the premiums, co-payments, and any other costs associated
101 with participation in the employer-sponsored health
102 insurance. If the department elects to pay such person's
103 employer-sponsored insurance costs under this subsection,
104 the medical assistance provided under this section shall be
105 provided to an eligible person as a secondary or
106 supplemental policy for only personal care assistance
107 services, as defined in section 208.900, and related costs
108 and nonemergency medical transportation to any employer-
109 sponsored benefits that may be available to such person.
110 7. The department of social services shall provide to
111 the general assembly an annual report that identifies the

SB 1708 5
112 number of participants in the program and describes the
113 outreach and education efforts to increase awareness and
114 enrollment in the program.
115 8. The department of social services shall submit such
116 state plan amendments and waivers to the Centers for
117 Medicare and Medicaid Services of the federal Department of
118 Health and Human Services as the department determines are
119 necessary to implement the provisions of this section.
120 [9. The provisions of this section shall expire August
121 28, 2025.]
✓